District of Columbia statutes.
31-3702

Applicability and scope.

(a)

Except as otherwise specifically provided, this subchapter shall apply to:

(1)

All Medicare supplement policies delivered or issued for delivery in the District of Columbia on or after October 1, 1992; and

(2)

All certificates issued under group Medicare supplement policies, which certificates have been delivered or issued for delivery in the District of Columbia.

(b)

This subchapter shall not apply to a policy for 1 or more employers or labor organizations, or of the trustees of a fund established by 1 or more employers or labor organizations, or combination thereof, for employees or former employees or a combination thereof, or for members or former members, or a combination thereof, of the labor organizations.

(c)

Except as otherwise specifically provided in § 31-3706(d) [sic], the provisions of this subchapter are not intended to prohibit or apply to insurance policies or health care benefit plans, including group conversion policies, provided to Medicare eligible persons, which policies are not marketed or held to be Medicare supplement policies or benefit plans.

Oct. 1, 1992, D.C. Law 9-170, § 3, 39 DCR 5825
Apr. 9, 1997, D.C. Law 11-202, §§ 2(b)-(c), 43 DCR 6054
1981 Ed., § 35-2612.
See Historical and Statutory Notes following § 31-3701.
For temporary amendment of section, see § 2(b) and (c) of the Medicare Supplement Insurance Minimum Standards Emergency Amendment Act of 1996 (D.C. Act 11-244, April 11, 1996, 43 DCR 2119), § 2(b) and (c) of the Medicare Supplement Insurance Minimum Standards Legislative Review Emergency Amendment Act of 1996 (D.C. Act 11-396, October 9, 1996, 43 DCR 5684), § 2(b) and (c) of the Medicare Supplement Insurance Minimum Standards Congressional Review Emergency Amendment Act of 1996 (D.C. Act 11-416, October 28, 1996, 43 DCR 6078), § 2(b) and (c) of the Medicare Supplement Insurance Minimum Standards Second Congressional Review Emergency Amendment Act of 1996 (D.C. Act 11-474, December 30, 1996, 44 DCR 198), and see § 2(b) and (c) of the Medicare Supplement Insurance Minimum Standards Congressional Review Emergency Amendment Act of 1997 (D.C. Act 12-49, March 31, 1997, 44 DCR 2112).